Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.120

Payment of a fine.

Where payment of a fine is required as a result of a disciplinary action under RCW 18.235.060 or 18.235.150 and timely payment is not made as directed in the final order, the disciplinary authority may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county in which the hearing was held. This right of enforcement is in addition to any other rights the disciplinary authority may have as to any licensee ordered to pay a fine but may not be construed to limit a licensee's ability to seek judicial review under RCW 18.235.090. In any action for enforcement of an order of payment of a fine, the disciplinary authority's order is conclusive proof of the validity of the order of a fine and the terms of payment.

[ 2002 c 86 s 113.]